Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
Article 1 General Provisions

28-3-1.
Doorkeeper and messenger in House of Representatives; sergeant-at-arms in Senate.

The House of Representatives is entitled to a doorkeeper and a messenger who shall perform such duties as may be required of them, who shall be elected as provided for the election of the Clerk of the House of Representatives, and who shall be compensated as provided by resolution of the House of Representatives. The Senate is entitled to a sergeant-at-arms who shall perform such duties as may be required of him, who shall be elected by the Senate, and who shall be compensated as provided by resolution of the Senate.

History.

Ga. L. 1862-63, p. 139, § 2; Code 1863, § 178; Code 1868, § 173; Code 1873, § 184; Code 1882, § 184; Civil Code 1895, § 296; Civil Code 1910, § 338; Code 1933, § 47-301; Ga. L. 1966, p. 544, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 385, § 1.

Cross references.

Election of Clerk of the House of Representatives and Secretary of the Senate, §

28-3-20

.